Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 4. Hazardous Waste Management.

§ 10.1-1426.
Permits required; waiver of requirements; reports; conditional permits.

No person shall store, provide treatment for, or dispose of a hazardous waste without a permit from the Director.

Any person generating, transporting, storing, providing treatment for, or disposing of a hazardous waste shall report to the Director, by such date as the Board specifies by regulation, the following: (i) his name and address, (ii) the name and nature of the hazardous waste, and (iii) the fact that he is generating, transporting, storing, providing treatment for or disposing of a hazardous waste. A person who is an exempt small quantity generator of hazardous wastes, as defined by the administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency, shall be exempt from the requirements of this subsection.

Any permit shall contain the conditions or requirements required by the Board’s regulations and the federal acts.

Upon the issuance of an emergency permit for the storage of hazardous waste, the Director shall notify the chief administrative officer of the local government for the jurisdiction in which the permit has been issued.

The Director may deny an application under this article on any grounds for which a permit may be amended, suspended or revoked listed under subsection A of §

10.1-1427

.

Any locality or state agency may collect hazardous waste from exempt small quantity generators for shipment to a permitted treatment or disposal facility if done in accordance with (i) a permit to store, treat, or dispose of hazardous waste issued pursuant to this chapter or (ii) a permit to transport hazardous waste, and the wastes collected are stored for no more than 10 days prior to shipment to a permitted treatment or disposal facility. If household hazardous waste is collected and managed with hazardous wastes collected from exempt small quantity generators, all waste shall be managed in accordance with the provisions of this subsection.

History.

1986, cc. 492, 563, § 10-279; 1988, c. 891; 1992, c. 463; 2004, c. 442; 2014, c. 139.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 442 added subsection F.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 139, in subsection A, deleted “transport,” following “No person shall.”

Law Review.

For note, “Federal and State Remedies to Clean Up Hazardous Waste Sites,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 379 (1986).

For 2003/2004 survey of environmental law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 203 (2004).

§ 10.1-1427.
Revocation, suspension or amendment of permits.

Any permit issued by the Director pursuant to this article may be revoked, amended or suspended on any of the following grounds or on such other grounds as may be provided by the regulations of the Board:

The permit holder has violated any regulation or order of the Board, any condition of a permit, any provision of this chapter, or any order of a court, where such violation (i) results in a release of harmful substances into the environment, (ii) poses a threat of release of harmful substances into the environment, (iii) presents a hazard to human health, or (iv) is representative of a pattern of serious or repeated violations which, in the opinion of the Director, demonstrates the permittee’s disregard for or inability to comply with applicable laws, regulations or requirements;

The person to whom the permit was issued abandons, sells, leases or ceases to operate the facility permitted;

The facilities used in the transportation, storage, treatment or disposal of hazardous waste are operated, located, constructed or maintained in such a manner as to pose a substantial present or potential hazard to human health or the environment, including pollution of air, land, surface water or ground water;

Such protective construction or equipment as is found to be reasonable, technologically feasible and necessary to prevent substantial present or potential hazard to human health and welfare or the environment has not been installed at a facility used for the storage, treatment or disposal of a hazardous waste; or

Any key personnel have been convicted of any of the following crimes punishable as felonies under the laws of the Commonwealth or the equivalent thereof under the laws of any other jurisdiction: murder; kidnapping; gambling; robbery; bribery; extortion; criminal usury; arson; burglary; theft and related crimes; forgery and fraudulent practices; fraud in the offering, sale, or purchase of securities; alteration of motor vehicle identification numbers; unlawful manufacture, purchase, use or transfer of firearms; unlawful possession or use of destructive devices or explosives; violation of the Drug Control Act (§ 54.1-3400 et seq.); racketeering; violation of antitrust laws; or has been adjudged by an administrative agency or a court of competent jurisdiction to have violated the environmental protection laws of the United States, the Commonwealth, or any other state and the Director determines that such conviction or adjudication is sufficiently probative of the applicant’s inability or unwillingness to operate the facility in a lawful manner, as to warrant denial, revocation, amendment or suspension of the permit.In making such determination, the Director shall consider:

The nature and details of the acts attributed to key personnel;

The degree of culpability of the applicant, if any;

The applicant’s policy or history of discipline of key personnel for such activities;

Whether the applicant has substantially complied with all rules, regulations, permits, orders and statutes applicable to the applicant’s activities in Virginia;

Whether the applicant has implemented formal management control to minimize and prevent the occurrence of such violations; and

Mitigation based upon demonstration of good behavior by the applicant including, without limitation, prompt payment of damages, cooperation with investigations, termination of employment or other relationship with key personnel or other persons responsible for the violations or other demonstrations of good behavior by the applicant that the Director finds relevant to his decision.

The Director may amend or attach conditions to a permit when:

There is a significant change in the manner and scope of operation which may require new or additional permit conditions or safeguards to protect the public health and environment;

There is found to be a possibility of pollution causing significant adverse effects on the air, land, surface water or ground water;

Investigation has shown the need for additional equipment, construction, procedures and testing to ensure the protection of the public health and the environment from significant adverse effects; or

The amendment is necessary to meet changes in applicable regulatory requirements.

If the Director finds that hazardous wastes are no longer being stored, treated or disposed of at a facility in accordance with Board regulations, the Director may revoke the permit issued for such facility or, as a condition to granting or continuing in effect a permit, may require the person to whom the permit was issued to provide perpetual care and surveillance of the facility.

History.

1986, c. 492, § 10-280; 1988, c. 891; 1992, c. 463.

§ 10.1-1428.
Financial responsibility for abandoned facilities; penalties.

The Board shall promulgate regulations which ensure that, if a facility in which hazardous waste is stored, treated, or disposed is closed or abandoned, the costs associated with protecting the public health and safety from the consequences of such abandonment may be recovered from the person abandoning the facility.

Such regulations may include bonding requirements, the creation of a trust fund to be maintained within the Department, self-insurance, other forms of commercial insurance, or other mechanisms that the Department deems appropriate. Regulations governing the amount thereof shall take into consideration the potential for contamination and injury by the hazardous waste, the cost of disposal of the hazardous waste and the cost of restoring the facility to a safe condition.

No state agency shall be required to comply with such regulations.

Forfeiture of any financial obligation imposed pursuant to this section shall not relieve any holder of a permit issued pursuant to this article of any other legal obligations for the consequences of abandonment of any facility.

Any funds forfeited pursuant to this section and the regulations of the Board shall be paid over to the Director, who shall then expend the forfeited funds as necessary to restore and maintain the facility in a safe condition. Nothing in this section shall require the Director to expend funds from any other source to carry out the activities contemplated under this section.

Any person who knowingly and willfully abandons a hazardous waste management facility without proper closure or without providing adequate financial assurance instruments for such closure shall, if such failure to close results in a significant harm or an imminent and substantial threat of significant harm to human health or the environment, be liable to the Commonwealth and any political subdivision for the costs incurred in abating, controlling, preventing, removing, or containing such harm or threat.Any person who knowingly and willfully abandons a hazardous waste management facility without proper closure or without providing adequate financial assurance instruments for such closure shall, if such failure to close results in a significant harm or an imminent and substantial threat of significant harm to human health or the environment, be guilty of a Class 4 felony.

History.

1986, c. 492, § 10-281; 1988, c. 891; 1991, c. 702; 2005, c. 180.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 felonies, see §

18.2-10

. As to special orders requiring that owner file plan to abate, control, prevent, remove, or contain any substantial and imminent threat to public health or the environment, see § 62.1-44.15:1.1.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 180, in subsection E, substituted “over to the Director, who shall then” for “to the county, city or town in which the abandoned facility is located. The county, city or town in which the facility is located shall” in the former first and second sentences to make the first sentence, and added the last sentence.

§ 10.1-1429.
Notice of release of hazardous substance.

Any person responsible for the release of a hazardous substance from a fixed facility which poses an immediate or imminent threat to public health and who is required by law to notify the National Response Center shall notify the chief administrative officer or his designee of the local government of the jurisdiction in which the release occurs and shall also notify the Department.

History.

1986, c. 492, § 10-282; 1988, c. 891.

Law Review.

For an article reviewing key environmental developments at the federal and state levels during the period from June 1996 to June 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1217 (1998).